Arkansas, session 2025, SB178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-6-106(d), concerning the authority of a
surrogate under the Arkansas Healthcare Decisions Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(d)(1) A surrogate may apply for public benefits, such as Medicare and
Medicaid, for the principal, subject to any federal restrictions or
requirements, and have access to information to the extent required to make
an application, may obtain records regarding the principal's income, assets,
and banking and financial records to the extent required to make an
application on an account of which the principal is:
(A) The owner or co-owner; or
(B) A beneficiary, including without limitation a trust,
guardianship, or conservatorship.
(2) The authority under subdivision (d)(1) of this section
*JMB196*
02/03/2025 8:41:19 AM JMB196

SB178
includes without limitation the ability to assist with, submit, and execute
applications for benefits, redetermination of eligibility, and other ongoing
related communications.
(3) The authority under subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall
terminate when revoked by a principal who no longer lacks decisional
capacity, upon appointment or availability of a power of attorney or guardian
with such authority, or upon the death of the principal.
(4)(A) The authority under subdivision (d)(1) of this section
shall be granted to a surrogate from a principal in writing or recorded
orally shall only be exercised by the surrogate upon presentation of written
designation signed by the principal or supervising healthcare provider as
provided in § 20-6-105(c) that is either notarized or signed by two (2) non-
familial witnesses.
(B) The written designation shall:
(i) Identify the principal;
(ii) Identify the designated surrogate;
(iii) State the date of the designation of the
surrogate by the principal or by the supervising healthcare provider; and
(iv) If appointed by a supervising healthcare
provider:
(a) Attest that the principal has been
determined by a licensed physician to lack capacity and an agent or guardian
has not been appointed or the agent or guardian is not reasonably available;
and
(b) State that the written document is
executed in conformance with this section for the purpose of allowing the
surrogate to apply for public benefits on behalf of the principal.
(5) The authority under subdivision (d)(1) of this section to
access records regarding the principal’s income and assets, including bank
account and financial records, does not confer the authority to control,
direct, or otherwise access the principal’s income, assets, or accounts upon
the surrogate.
(6)(A) A person or entity to whom a written designation is
presented as described in subdivision (d)(4) of this section may rely on the
written designation if the written designation appears on its face to comply
with this section.
02/03/2025 8:41:19 AM JMB196

SB178
(B) If the written designation does not appear on its face
to comply with this section or if the recipient has reasonable cause to
suspect the written designation does not comply with this section, the
recipient may decline to provide the requested record.
(C) A person or entity that provides information or
records, or both, to a surrogate under this section is not liable to the
principal, surrogate, or other person or entity for providing the information
or records, or both.
(7)(A) If bank account or financial records are sought for an
account co-owned by the principal and another person or entity or an account
of which the principal is a beneficiary, the bank or financial institution
shall give written notice to the joint account holder or the signatory on the
entity account of the request and allow them an opportunity to object in
writing to the request within ten (10) business days.
(B) If the bank or financial institution does not receive
a written objection within ten (10) business days of the date on the notice
described in subdivision (d)(7)(A) of this section, the bank or financial
institution may allow the surrogate to obtain the records if the request is
otherwise in accordance with the requirements of this subchapter.
(C) If the bank or financial institution receives a
written objection within ten (10) business days of the date of the notice
described in subdivision (d)(7)(A) of this section, the bank or financial
institution shall notify the surrogate of the objection and decline the
request for records.
(8) Except as provided in subdivision (d)(7) of this section,
the surrogate may receive only records which the principal would be entitled
upon request to receive when making a request for records.
(9)(A) The records, materials, data, and information made
available by a financial services provider are confidential and shall not be
disclosed to any person other than as necessary to apply for public benefits
on behalf of the principal.
(B) The surrogate shall securely destroy all copies of the
information upon termination of the authority under subdivision (d)(3) of
this section.
(C) Upon request, all information and records obtained by
a surrogate under subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall be promptly and
02/03/2025 8:41:19 AM JMB196

SB178
securely transferred to a properly appointed successor surrogate, power of
attorney, or guardian or to a principal who no longer lacks decisional
capacity.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-6-111, concerning liability for a
healthcare provider or healthcare institution under the Arkansas Healthcare
Decisions Act, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(d) A person or entity that relies in good faith on a written
surrogacy designation under this subchapter is not subject to civil or
criminal liability, including any administrative proceeding, for providing
the surrogate with access to records regarding the principal’s income,
assets, and banking and financial accounts for the surrogate to make an
application for public benefits on behalf of the principal.























02/03/2025 8:41:19 AM JMB196